Washington statutes.
RCW 38.38.576

[Art. 70] Remission and suspension.

(1) A convening authority may remit or suspend any part or amount of the unexecuted part of any sentence, including all uncollected forfeitures.

(2) The governor may, for good cause, substitute an administrative form of discharge for a discharge or dismissal executed in accordance with the sentence of a court martial.

[ 1963 c 220 s 72.]